Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 4, section 109, is amended to read: Sec. 109. TRAFFIC SAFETY VIOLATIONS DISPOSITION ANALYSIS. (a) The commissioner of public safety must enter into an agreement with the Center for Transportation Studies at the University of Minnesota to conduct an evaluation of the disposition in recent years of citations for speeding, impairment, distraction, and seatbelt violations. The evaluation under the agreement must include but is not limited to analysis of: (1) rates of citations issued compared to rates of citations contested in court and the outcomes of the cases; (2) amounts of fines imposed compared to counts and amounts of fine payments; and (3) any related changes in patterns of traffic enforcement from 2017 to 2022. (b) The agreement must require the Center for Transportation Studies to submit an interim progress report by July 1, 2024, and a final report by deleted text begin July 1, 2025deleted text end new text begin January 15, 2026new text end , to the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance and public safety. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end